Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 13-101, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 13-101. A. For the purposes of this title:


1. “Child with a disability” means a child who is at least


three (3) years of age but has not reached twenty-two (22) years of


age with intellectual disabilities, hearing impairments, speech or


language impairments, visual impairments, serious emotional


disturbance, orthopedic impairments, autism, traumatic brain injury,


other health impairments, or specific learning disabilities and who,


by reason thereof, needs special education and related services;


2. “Free appropriate public education” means special education


and related services that:


a. have been provided at public expense, under public


supervision and direction, and without charge,


b. meet the standards of the State Department of


Education, and


c. are provided in conformity with a child’s IEP;


3. “Individualized education program” or “IEP” means a written


statement for each child with a disability that is developed,



Req. No. 2304 Page 2


reviewed, and revised in accordance with the provisions of Section


13-102 of this title. The IEP shall include:


a. a statement of the child’s present levels of academic


achievement and functional performance,


b. a statement of measurable annual goals including


academic and functional goals,


c. a description of how the child’s progress toward


meeting the annual goals will be measured and when


periodic reports on the progress the child is making


toward meeting the annual goals is to be provided,


d. a statement of the special education and related


services and supplementary aids and services, based on


peer-reviewed research to the extent practicable, to


be provided to the child, or on behalf of the child,


and a statement of the program modifications or


supports for school personnel that are to be provided


for the child,


e. an explanation of the extent, if any, to which the


child will not participate with nondisabled children


in the regular class and activities,


f. a statement of any individual appropriate


accommodations that are necessary to measure the


academic achievement and functional performance of the


child on statewide assessments and district-

Req. No. 2304 Page 3


administered assessments. If the IEP team determines,


and parental consent is provided as required by


Section 13-114.6 of this title, that the child shall


take an alternate assessment, the IEP shall include a


statement of why the child cannot participate in the


regular assessment and why the alternate assessment


selected is appropriate for the child,


g. the projected date for the beginning of the services


and modifications including the anticipated frequency,


location, and duration of such services and


modifications, and


h. beginning no later than the first IEP to be in effect


when the child is age sixteen (16) years and updated


annually thereafter:


(1) appropriate measurable postsecondary goals based


on age-appropriate transition assessments related


to training, education, employment, and, where


appropriate, independent living skills,


(2) transition services needed to assist the child in


reaching the postsecondary goals, and


(3) beginning no later than one (1) year before the


child reaches age eighteen (18) years, a


statement that the child has been informed of his



Req. No. 2304 Page 4


or her rights, if any, that will transfer upon


reaching age eighteen (18) years; and


4. “Individualized education program team” or “IEP team” means


a group of individuals composed of:


a. the parents or legal guardians of a child with a


disability,


b. at least one regular education teacher of the child


with a disability if the child is participating in the


regular education environment,


c. at least one special education teacher or, where


appropriate, at least one special education provider,


d. a representative of the school district,


e. an individual who can interpret the instructional


implications of evaluation results who may also meet


the requirements of subparagraphs b through d of this


paragraph,


f. other individuals who have knowledge or special


expertise regarding the child including related


service personnel, at the discretion of the child’s


parent or legal guardian or the school district, and


g. the child with a disability, whenever appropriate.


B. 1. The several school School districts of Oklahoma in this


state are hereby authorized to provide special education and related


services necessary for children with disabilities as hereinafter

Req. No. 2304 Page 5


defined as provided for in the Individuals with Disabilities


Education Act (IDEA) and the provisions of this act. Two or more


school districts may establish cooperative programs of special


education for children with disabilities when such arrangement is


approved by the State Board of Education. Funds may be expended for


school services for an additional period during the summer months


for approved programs for qualified children with disabilities,


provided their individualized education program (I.E.P.) IEP states


the need for extended school year special education and related


services. Children with disabilities shall mean children, as


defined in the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA),


P.L. No. 105-17, who are three (3) years of age.


2. Provided, on On and after July 1, 1991, children from age


birth through two (2) years (0-36 months) of age three (3) years who


meet the eligibility criteria specified in Section 13-123 of this


title, shall be served pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Early Intervention Act. The attendance of said such children in


special education classes shall be included in the average daily


membership computations for State Aid purposes.


C. The State Board of Education is authorized to modify and


redefine by regulation the eligibility definitions whenever such


modification is required to receive federal assistance under the


Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), P.L. No. 105-17


provisions of IDEA. Rules developed pursuant to Section 18-109.5 of

Req. No. 2304 Page 6


this title shall provide for such modification and revised


definitions.


D. It shall be the duty of each school district to provide


special education and related services for all children with


disabilities as herein defined who reside in that school district in


accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act


(IDEA), P.L. No. 105-17 IDEA. This duty may be satisfied by:


1. The district directly providing special education for such


children;


2. The district joining in a cooperative program with another


district or districts to provide special education for such


children;


3. The district joining in a written agreement with a private


or public institution, licensed residential child care and treatment


facility, or day treatment facility within such district to provide


special education for children who are deaf or hard-of-hearing,


children who are blind or partially blind, or other eligible


children with disabilities; or


4. Transferring eligible children and youth with disabilities


to other school districts which accept them and provide special


education and related services for such children, with the district


in which the child resides paying tuition therefor as hereinafter


provided. For those students who transfer pursuant to the


provisions of the Education Open Transfer Act, the receiving school

Req. No. 2304 Page 7


district shall assume all responsibility for education and shall


count the student for federal and state funding purposes according


to the provisions of subsection B of Section 13-103 of this title.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 13-102, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 13-102. A. The determination of whether a child is


eligible for special education and related services shall be the


responsibility of the multidisciplinary evaluation team of the


school district in which such child has legal residence in


accordance with the provisions of the Individuals with Disabilities


Education Act (IDEA), P.L. No. 101-476 and the rules approved by the


State Board of Education. The eligibility of children with


disabilities shall be reevaluated at least once every three (3)


years or more frequently if conditions warrant or if the parent or


teacher of the child requests an evaluation as required under the


Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), P.L. No. 101-476


IDEA.


B. A school district or the parent or legal guardian of a child


may initiate a request for an initial evaluation to determine if he


or she is a child with a disability. An initial evaluation shall be


conducted within sixty (60) days of receiving consent from a parent


or legal guardian. The sixty-day period shall not apply if a parent


or legal guardian fails to produce the child for the evaluation or


if the child transfers to another school district.

Req. No. 2304 Page 8


1. Consent from a parent or legal guardian to conduct an


initial evaluation shall not be construed as consent for development


of an individualized education program (IEP) or consent for a child


to receive special education and related services.


2. If a child’s parent or legal guardian fails to respond to a


request to provide consent or refuses to provide consent for the


child to receive special education and related services, the school


district in which the child is enrolled shall be prohibited from


providing such services. The school district shall not be found to


be in violation of the provisions of IDEA to provide a free


appropriate public education to the child and shall not be required


to convene an IEP team meeting or to develop an IEP for the child.


3. For a child who is a ward of the state and does not reside


with his or her parent or legal guardian, a school district shall


make reasonable efforts to obtain consent for an initial evaluation


to determine whether the child is a child with a disability.


4. Consent for an initial evaluation shall not be required if:


a. despite reasonable efforts to do so, the school


district cannot discover the whereabouts of the


child’s parent or legal guardian,


b. the rights of the child’s parent or parents have been


terminated in accordance with state law, or


c. the rights of the child’s parent or parents to make


educational decisions have been subrogated by a judge

Req. No. 2304 Page 9


in accordance with state law and consent for initial


evaluation has been given by an individual appointed


by the judge to represent the child.


C. Any child determined to be a child with a disability and


eligible shall be permitted to receive such special education and


related services for a minimum period of twelve (12) years.


Successful completion of a secondary education program must shall be


determined through the individualized education program (IEP) IEP


and transcript records of the student. Eligibility for special


education and related services shall cease upon a determination and


documentation of graduation or completion of a secondary education


program in accordance with the IEP. In no event shall eligibility


for special education and related services cease prior to a child


with a disability reaching twenty-two (22) years of age unless he or


she has graduated with a standard or alternate diploma or otherwise


completed a secondary education program in accordance with his or


her IEP.


D. 1. A school district shall conduct a reevaluation of each


child with a disability if:


a. the school district determines that the educational or


related service needs including improved academic


achievement and functional performance of the child


warrant a reevaluation, or



Req. No. 2304 Page 10


b. the child’s parent, legal guardian, or teacher


requests a reevaluation.


2. A reevaluation shall be conducted at least once every three


(3) years unless the parent or legal guardian and the school


district agree that a reevaluation is unnecessary. A reevaluation


conducted pursuant to this subsection shall not occur more


frequently than once a year unless the child’s parent or legal


guardian and the school district agree.


E. A school district shall provide prior notice to the parent


or legal guardian of a child with a disability that includes a


description of any evaluation procedures to be used.


F. In conducting an evaluation or reevaluation, a school


district shall:


1. Use a variety of assessment tools and strategies to gather


relevant, functional, developmental, and academic information


including information that may be provided by a parent or legal


guardian that may assist in determining whether the child is a child


with a disability and the content of the child’s IEP;


2. Not use any single measure or assessment as the sole


criterion for determining whether a child is a child with a


disability or determining an appropriate educational program for the


child;





Req. No. 2304 Page 11


3. Use technically sound instruments that may assess the


relative contribution of cognitive and behavioral factors in


addition to physical or developmental factors;


4. Ensure that assessments and other evaluation materials used


to assess a child:


a. are selected and administered so as not to be


discriminatory on a racial or cultural basis,


b. are provided and administered in the language and form


most likely to yield accurate information on what the


child knows and can do academically, developmentally,


and functionally, unless it is not feasible to so


provide or administer,


c. are used for purposes for which assessments or


measures are valid and reliable,


d. are administered by trained and knowledgeable


personnel, and


e. are administered in accordance with any instructions


provided by the producer of such assessments;


5. Ensure a child is assessed in all areas of suspected


disability;


6. Review existing evaluation data on the child including


evaluations and information provided by the parent or legal guardian


of the child; current classroom-based, local, or state assessments;



Req. No. 2304 Page 12


classroom-based observations; and observations by teachers and


related service providers; and


7. Ensure that assessments of a child with a disability who


transfers from one school district to another in the same academic


year are coordinated with the sending and receiving school districts


as necessary and as expeditiously as possible to ensure prompt


completion of evaluations.


G. Upon completion of an evaluation or reevaluation conducted


pursuant to this section, the determination of whether a child is a


child with a disability and the educational needs of the child shall


be made by an IEP team. The school district shall provide the


child’s parent or legal guardian a copy of the evaluation report and


the documentation determining eligibility for special education and


related services.


H. 1. A member of an IEP team shall not be required to attend


an IEP meeting, in whole or in part, if the parent or legal guardian


of the child with a disability and the school district agree that


such attendance is not necessary.


2. A member of an IEP team may be excused from attending an IEP


meeting, in whole or in part, when the meeting involves a


modification to or discussion of the member’s area of curriculum or


related services if the parent or legal guardian of the child with a


disability and the school district provide written consent for



Req. No. 2304 Page 13


excusal and the IEP team member submits in writing input into the


development of the IEP prior to the meeting.


I. A child shall not be determined to be a child with a


disability and eligible for special education and related services


if the determinant factor is:


1. A lack of appropriate instruction in reading including in


the essential components of reading instruction;


2. A lack of instruction in mathematics; or


3. Limited English proficiency.


J. In determining whether a child has a specific learning


disability as defined by Section 18-109.5 of this title, a school


district shall not be required to take into consideration whether a


child has a severe discrepancy between achievement and intellectual


ability in oral expression, listening comprehension, written


expression, basic reading skills, reading comprehension,


mathematical calculation, or mathematical reasoning. A school


district may use a process that determines whether a child responds


to specific scientific, research-based intervention as a part of the


evaluation or reevaluation procedures used in accordance with


subsection F of this section.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13-103.1 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 2304 Page 14


A. The State Board of Education shall establish and maintain


policies and procedures to ensure that children with disabilities


and their parents or legal guardians are guaranteed procedural


safeguards with respect to the provision of a free appropriate


public education. The policies and procedures shall include:


1. An opportunity for the parent or legal guardian of a child


with a disability to examine all records relating to such child and


to participate in meetings regarding the identification, evaluation,


and educational placement of the child and regarding the provision


of a free appropriate public education to the child, and to obtain


an independent educational evaluation of the child;


2. Protection of the rights of a child with a disability when


the child’s parent or legal guardian is unknown; the school district


cannot, after reasonable efforts, locate the child’s parent or legal


guardian; or the child is a ward of the state including the


assignment of an individual to act as a surrogate for the parent or


legal guardian. A surrogate shall not be an employee of the State


Department of Education, the school district in which the child is


enrolled, or any other agency that is involved in the education or


care of the child;


3. Written prior notice to the parent or legal guardian of a


child with a disability who is under the age of twenty-two (22)


whenever the school district proposes to initiate or change or


refuses to initiate or change the identification, evaluation, or

Req. No. 2304 Page 15


educational placement of the child or the provision of a free


appropriate public education to the child. The notice shall include


information about policies and procedures for mediation available to


the parent or legal guardian pursuant to subsection F of this


section. Notice shall be provided in the native language of the


child’s parent or legal guardian unless it is not feasible to do so;


4. An opportunity for mediation, which shall:


a. be voluntary on the part of the parties,


b. not be used to deny or delay the rights of a parent or


legal guardian to a due process hearing as provided


for in subsection E of this section, and


c. be conducted by a qualified and impartial mediator who


is trained in effective mediation techniques;


5. An opportunity for any party to present a complaint:


a. with respect to any matter relating to the


identification, evaluation, or educational placement


of the child or the provision of a free appropriate


public education to such child, and


b. which sets forth an alleged violation that occurred


not more than two (2) years before the date the


child’s parent or legal guardian or the school


district in which the child is enrolled knew or should


have known about an alleged action that forms the


basis of the complaint;

Req. No. 2304 Page 16


6. Requirements that either party, or the attorney representing


a party, provide due process complaint notice to the other party and


such notice is submitted to the State Department of Education. The


notice shall include:


a. the name of the child,


b. the address of the residence of the child, or


available contact information if the child is


considered homeless children and youth as defined in


Section 600 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


c. the name of the school district in which the child is


enrolled,


d. a description of the nature of the problem relating to


proposed initiation or change including facts related


to such problem, and


e. a proposed resolution of the problem to the extent


known and available; and


7. A model form to assist parents and legal guardians in filing


a complaint and due process complaint notice in accordance with the


provisions of this subsection.


B. Each school district in this state shall provide a copy of


the procedural safeguards to parents and legal guardians of a child


with a disability enrolled in the school district annually, upon


initial referral or upon request for an initial evaluation, upon the


first occurrence of filing a complaint, and upon request of a parent

Req. No. 2304 Page 17


or legal guardian. A school district may post the procedural


safeguards on its website.


C. Within ten (10) days of receiving a due process complaint


notice as provided for in subsection A of this section, a school


district shall submit to the child’s parent or legal guardian a


response that includes the following:


1. An explanation of why the school district proposed or


refused to take the action raised in the complaint;


2. A description of other options that the IEP team considered


and the reasons why those options were rejected;


3. A description of each evaluation procedure, assessment,


record, or report the agency used as the basis for the proposed or


refused action; and


4. A description of the factors that are relevant to the school


district’s proposal or refusal.


D. The parent or legal guardian of a child with a disability


who submits a due process complaint notice as provided for in


subsection A of this section shall be given an opportunity for an


impartial due process hearing, which shall be conducted by the State


Department of Education.


E. Policies and procedures for a due process hearing shall


include:


1. a. A request for a due process hearing shall be made by


the parent or legal guardian of a child with a

Req. No. 2304 Page 18


disability or the State Department of Education within


two (2) years of the date the parent or legal guardian


or the Department knew or should have known about the


alleged action that forms the basis of the complaint.


b. The time limitation provided in this paragraph shall


not apply if the parent or legal guardian of a child


was prevented from requesting the hearing due to


specific misrepresentations by the school district


that it had resolved the problem forming the basis of


the complaint or the school district withheld required


information from the parent or legal guardian.


2. Within fifteen (15) days of receiving a due process


complaint notice as provided for in subsection A of this section,


the party providing a hearing officer shall provide notification of


such hearing.


3. A hearing officer shall:


a. not be an employee of the State Department of


Education or a school district involved in the


education or care of the child,


b. not be a person having a personal or professional


interest that conflicts with the person’s objectivity


in the hearing, and


c. possess knowledge of and the ability to understand the


provisions of the Individuals with Disabilities

Req. No. 2304 Page 19


Education Act (IDEA), legal interpretations thereof,


and associated federal and state regulations.


4. Within five (5) days of receiving the notification provided


for in paragraph 1 of this subsection, the hearing officer shall


make a determination of whether the due process complaint notice is


facially sufficient.


5. A party may amend its due process complaint notice only if:


a. the other party consents in writing to such amendment


and is given the opportunity to resolve the complaint,


or


b. the hearing officer grants permission no later than


five (5) days before a due process hearing is


scheduled.


6. Within five (5) days prior to a hearing conducted pursuant


to this subsection, each party shall disclose to all parties all


evaluations completed and recommendations made based on such


evaluations.


7. A decision made by a hearing officer shall be made on


substantive grounds based on a determination of whether the child


with a disability received a free appropriate public education.


Provided, however, a hearing officer may find that a child with a


disability did not receive a free appropriate public education based


on a procedural violation only if the procedural violation:



Req. No. 2304 Page 20


a. impeded the child’s right to a free appropriate public


education,


b. significantly impeded the opportunity of a parent or


legal guardian to participate in the decision-making


process regarding the provision of a free appropriate


public education to the child, or


c. caused a deprivation of educational benefits.


8. Any party aggrieved by the findings and decision rendered in


a due process hearing conducted by the State Department of Education


pursuant to the provisions of this subsection may appeal such


findings and decision to the Department. The Department shall


conduct an impartial review of the findings and decision, and the


officer conducting such review shall make an independent decision


upon completion of such review.


9. Any party to a due process hearing conducted pursuant to the


provisions of this subsection shall be accorded:


a. the right to be accompanied and advised by counsel and


by individuals with special knowledge or training


regarding the problems of children with disabilities,


b. the right to present evidence and confront, cross


examine, and compel the attendance of witnesses, and


c. the right to a written or, at the option of a child’s


parent or legal guardian, an electronic verbatim


record of such hearing.

Req. No. 2304 Page 21


10. Any party who brings a civil action with regard to a due


process complaint shall have ninety (90) days from the date of the


decision of a hearing officer to bring such action.


F. The State Department of Education shall adopt policies and


procedures for mediation to resolve disputes over the


identification, evaluation, educational placement, manifestation


determination, interim alternative educational placement, or the


provision of a free appropriate public education to a child with a


disability. The policies and procedures shall include:


1. A conciliation conference, which a parent or legal guardian


may request to meet with the IEP team or appropriate school district


staff to discuss any objections to the prior notice received


pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section. Within


five (5) days after the conciliation conference, the school district


shall provide the parent or legal guardian a conciliation conference


memorandum describing the district’s final proposed services for the


student;


2. A facilitated IEP team meeting led by an impartial


facilitator provided by the State Department of Education;


3. An opportunity to meet with a disinterested party. The


State Department of Education shall develop and maintain a list of


qualified mediators who are knowledgeable in the laws and


regulations relating to the provision of special education and


related services;

Req. No. 2304 Page 22


4. A provision stating that the cost of the mediation process


shall be borne by the state;


5. A requirement that mediation sessions be scheduled in a


timely manner and be held in a location that is convenient to the


parties to the dispute. A district shall hold a conciliation


conference, facilitated IEP team meeting, or other mediation within


ten (10) calendar days from the date the public school district


receives the request from a parent or legal guardian;


6. A confidentiality provision to ensure that discussions that


occur during the mediation process cannot be used as evidence in any


subsequent due process hearing or civil proceeding;


7. A requirement to execute a written, legally binding


agreement when a resolution is reached through the mediation


process. The agreement shall be signed by the parent or legal


guardian of the child with a disability and an authorized school


district representative;


8. A provision allowing any party to a mediation conducted


pursuant to the provisions of this subsection to request additional


mediation to address implementation of any mediated agreement; and


9. A provision prohibiting mediators, facilitators, and any of


their records associated with a mediation conducted pursuant to the


provisions of this section from being subject to subpoena in a civil


action.



Req. No. 2304 Page 23


G. The State Department of Education shall develop and publish


on its website a model form to be used by parents and legal


guardians to request any of the mediation procedures provided for in


subsection F of this section.


H. While a due process hearing or mediation session is pending,


a child with a disability shall remain in his or her current


educational placement, unless the State Department of Education, the


school district in which the student is enrolled, or his or her


parent or legal guardian otherwise agree. If the child was applying


for initial admission to a school district, he or she shall be


placed in the school district until all such proceedings have been


completed.


I. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2304 EB 1/15/2026 9:20:30 AM







Req. No. 2304 Page 24